Utah statutes.
78B-1-207.   Oath of interpreter.

Before he or she begins to interpret, every interpreter appointed under this part shall take an oath that he or she will make a true interpretation in an understandable manner to the best of his or her skills and judgment.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

